Oklahoma, session 2026, SB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated


from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal


year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Three Hundred Million Dollars


($300,000,000.00) to implement a program of reparations for damages


to persons and property that occurred during the events of


approximately May 31, 1921, through June 1, 1921, in the City of


Tulsa, which events shall be known as the “Tulsa Race Massacre”.

Req. No. 907 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce, with the assistance of


nonprofit organizations or any other state agency, board,


commission, or department with information or resources that could


be of assistance to the Department, shall create and administer a


program pursuant to which survivors of the Tulsa Race Massacre and


descendants of victims of the Tulsa Race Massacre may make


application to and receive payments from the Tulsa Race Massacre


Compensation Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 3 of this


act.


B. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall work in


conjunction with and receive input from a committee to be composed


of the following persons:


1. A member of the Senate whose district includes the Greenwood


District in Tulsa;


2. A member of the House of Representatives whose district


includes the Greenwood District in Tulsa; and


3. A member to be appointed by the Chief Executive Officer of


the Oklahoma Department of Commerce.


C. The member of the Senate shall convene meetings to select


six other persons to constitute the committee for a total membership


of nine (9) persons.



Req. No. 907 Page 2


D. The persons to be selected shall be capable, community-


oriented persons representative of the historically and adversely


affected areas of the City of Tulsa.


E. The persons selected may include, but shall not be limited


to, historians, clergy members, attorneys, advocates, accountants,


and genealogists.


F. Nonprofit organizations or a state agency, board,


commission, department, or other entity of state government with


information or resources may provide assistance to the committee


members.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 25001 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the “Tulsa


Race Massacre Compensation Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce from appropriations and such other sources designated for


deposit in the fund. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund


are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce for the purpose of making payments


relating to damage to persons and property during the events of


approximately May 31, 1921, through June 1, 1921, in the City of

Req. No. 907 Page 3


Tulsa, which events for purposes of this act shall be designated the


“Tulsa Race Massacre”. Expenditures from the fund shall be made


upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as


prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-907 JC 1/19/2025 5:42:19 AM

























Req. No. 907 Page 4